Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1911
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-1906 to 29-1911 may be cited as the Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from Without a State in Criminal Proceedings.

Laws 1937, c. 71, § 6, p. 260;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-1911;

R.S.1943, § 29-1911.